Ohio, session 136, HB144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 3304.23 and 5502.08 of the Revised Code be amended to read as
ECTION
follows:
Sec. 3304.23. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Clinical nurse specialist" and "certified nurse practitioner" have the same meanings as in
section 4723.01 of the Revised Code.
(2) "Communication disability" means a human condition involving an impairment in the
human's ability to receive, send, process, or comprehend concepts or verbal, nonverbal, or graphic
symbol systems that may result in a primary disability or may be secondary to other disabilities.
(3) "Disability that can impair communication" means a human condition with symptoms
that can impair the human's ability to receive, send, process, or comprehend concepts or verbal,
nonverbal, or graphic symbol systemsan intellectual impairment, a hearing impairment (including
deafness), a speech or language impairment, a visual impairment (including blindness), a serious
emotional disturbance, an orthopedic impairment, autism, traumatic brain injury, a serious health
impairment, a specific learning impairment (including dyslexia), deaf-blindness, or a mental health
condition with symptoms that make it difficult for a person to do certain activities or to interact with
others.
(4)(3) "Guardian" has the same meaning as in section 2111.01 of the Revised Code.
(5)(4) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or surgery or osteopathic
medicine and surgery under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code.
(6)(5) "Psychiatrist" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code.
(7)(6) "Psychologist" has the same meaning as in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) The opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency shall develop a verification form
for a person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair
communication to be submitted voluntarily to the department of public safety so that the person may
be included in the database established under section 5502.08 of the Revised Code. The same form
shall be used to indicate that the person wishes to be removed from the database in accordance with
division (F) of section 5502.08 of the Revised Code.

H. B. No. 144 136th G.A.
2
(C) The form shall include the following information:
(1) The name of the person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that
can impair communication;
(2) The name of the person completing the form on behalf of the person diagnosed with a
communication disability or a disability that can impair communication, if applicable;
(3) The relationship between the person completing the form and the person diagnosed with
a communication disability or a disability that can impair communication, if applicable;
(4) The residential address of the individual in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section;
(5) The telephone number of the individual in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section;
(4)(6) The driver's license number or state identification card number issued to the person
diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair communication, if that
person has such a number;
(5)(7) The license plate number of each vehicle owned, operated, or regularly occupied by
the person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair communication
or registered in that person's name;
(6)(8) A certification that the person has been diagnosed with a communication disability or
a disability that can impair communication, signed by a psychiatrist or other physician, a
psychologist, a clinical nurse specialist, or a certified nurse practitioner;
(7)(9) The name, business address, business telephone number, and professional license
number of the professional making the certification described in division (C)(6) of this section;
(8)(10) The signature of the person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability
that can impair communication or the signature of the person completing the form on behalf of such
a person;
(9)(11) A place where the person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability
that can impair communication or the person completing the form on behalf of such a person may
indicate the desire to be removed from the database.
(D) Any of the following persons may complete the verification form:
(1) Any person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair
communication who is eighteen years of age or older;
(2) The parent or parents of a minor child diagnosed with a communication disability or a
disability that can impair communication;
(3) The guardian of a person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that
can impair communication, regardless of the age of the person.
(E)(E)(1) The opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, the department of
developmental disabilities, and the department of public safety shall make the verification form
electronically available on each of their respective web sites.
(2) The opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency and the department of
developmental disabilities shall conduct public outreach concerning the existence of the database

H. B. No. 144 136th G.A.
3
created under section 5502.08 of the Revised Code and include information regarding the database
on their respective web sites.
Sec. 5502.08. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Communication disability" has the same meaning as in section 3304.23 of the Revised
Code.
(2) "Disability that can impair communication" has the same meaning as in section 3304.23
of the Revised Code.
(3) (2) "Emergency medical service personnel" and "firefighter" have the same meanings as
in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code.
(3) "Guardian" has the same meaning as in section 2111.01 of the Revised Code.
(4) "Ward" has the same meaning as in section 2111.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) The department of public safety shall establish and maintain a database of persons who
register under this section as being diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that
can impair communication.
(C) Any person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair
communication who is eighteen years of age or older may register with the department for inclusion
in the database by submitting a completed verification form established by the opportunities for
Ohioans with disabilities agency under section 3304.23 of the Revised Code.
(D) Any parent or guardian of a minor child or a ward diagnosed with a communication
disability or a disability that can impair communication may register the minor child or the ward
with the department for inclusion in the database by submitting a completed verification form
established by the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency under section 3304.23 of the
Revised Code.
(E)(1) The department shall include in the database information provided on a completed
verification form that the department determines is necessary for a law enforcement officer,
emergency medical service personnel, or firefighter to identify a person as diagnosed with a
communication disability or a disability that can impair communication. The department shall make
the database available to state and local law enforcement officers, emergency medical service
personnel, and firefighters through the both of the following, as applicable:
(a) The law enforcement automated data system;
(b) Each countywide 9-1-1 system established under section 128.03 of the Revised Code. A
countywide 9-1-1 system shall use the database to provide information concerning an individual's
disability to local law enforcement officers, emergency medical service personnel, and firefighters,
as applicable, that are responding to a 9-1-1 communication concerning that individual.
(2) Information in the database is not a public record subject to inspection or copying under
section 149.43 of the Revised Code.
(F) A person diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair
communication who is included in the database or the parent or guardian of a minor child or a ward

H. B. No. 144 136th G.A.
4
diagnosed with a communication disability or a disability that can impair communication who is
included in the database may request removal of the person, minor, or ward, as applicable, from the
database. The person, parent, or guardian shall do so by completing the verification form with only
the information required under divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (8)(10), and (9)(11) of section 3304.23 of
the Revised Code, as applicable, and submitting the form to the department. Upon receipt of a
properly completed verification form requesting the removal of a person with a communication
disability or a disability that can impair communication from the database, the department shall
immediately remove that person from the database.
S 2. That existing sections 3304.23 and 5502.08 of the Revised Code are hereby
ECTION
repealed.
S 3. This act shall be known as Keith's Law.
ECTION

H. B. No. 144 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

H. B. No. 144 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________